Vermont, session 2025-2026, H59.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. CHARTER AMENDMENT APPROVAL
The General Assembly approves the amendments to the charter of the City
of Burlington as set forth in this act. The voters approved the proposals of
amendment on November 5, 2024.
Sec. 2. 24 App. V.S.A. chapter 3 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 3. CITY OF BURLINGTON
* * *
§ 183. BOARD OF POLICE COMMISSIONERS; COMPOSITION; TERMS
The Board of Police Commissioners shall consist of seven legal voters of
said the City and should represent the diverse nature of the City’s constituents,
including those from historically marginalized communities, to be appointed
by the City Council with Mayor presiding to serve for three years and until
their successors are appointed and qualified.
§ 184. SAME—POWERS AND DUTIES
(a) The City Council shall make rules and regulations for the government
of the entire police force Police Department and shall fix the qualifications of
applicants for positions and service on said force the Department and, to the
extent permitted by applicable law, the Chief of Police shall furnish the City
Council with any information they may require concerning the finances of the
Police Department. The Chief of Police shall be responsible for all
VT LEG #379384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.59
2025 Page 3 of 9
expenditures made by the Police Department and no expenditures shall be
made by the Department except in conformity with the standards promulgated
by the City Council.
(b) The Board of Police Commissioners shall have such authority and
responsibility relating to the management, auditing, or monitoring of the Police
Department, its services, and facilities as may be delegated from time to time
by resolution, ordinance, and order of the City Council. Said The Board shall
notify the Mayor and, the Chief Administrative Officer, and the City Council,
in writing, of any and all changes, modifications, or additions to the rules and
regulations of the Department.
(c) Without limitation to the foregoing, the Board of Police Commissioners
and the Chief of Police may propose rules and regulations for the government
of the entire Police Department in a manner not inconsistent with those
established by the City Council. Adoption of the proposed rules and
regulations requires joint approval by the Board of Police Commissioners and
the Chief of Police. In the event joint approval is not provided by the Board of
Police Commissioners and the Chief of Police, either party may bring forward
to the City Council the proposed rule or regulation for the City Council’s
consideration.
(d) The Board of Police Commissioners shall have the authority to receive
and review all civilian and internal allegations of misconduct by members of
VT LEG #379384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.59
2025 Page 4 of 9
the Police Department. The Mayor’s proposed budget and the City Council
shall annually appropriate an amount necessary for the adequate support and
facilitation of such review. To the greatest extent permitted by law, the Chief
of Police shall provide the Board of Police Commissioners timely updates of
any review, investigation, or disposition of alleged misconduct. The Board of
Police Commissioners shall have the ability to request additional information
from the Chief of Police and access to those documents or other evidence
relied upon by the Chief of Police in reviewing allegations of misconduct as
the City Council shall designate by ordinance. For complaints of alleged
misconduct that constitute an offense subject to an investigation of the
Vermont Criminal Justice Training Council pursuant to 20 V.S.A § 2401 et
seq. or for which the Chief of Police intends to impose discipline constituting
loss of pay, suspension, or termination, the complaint shall not be disposed
until the Board of Police Commissioners is notified of the proposed
disposition.
(e)(1) After receiving notice from the Chief of Police of the recommended
or actual disposition relating to the review of alleged misconduct, the Board of
Police Commissioners shall have the authority to:
(A) recommend an alternative disposition to the Chief of Police
within a time established by ordinance; or
VT LEG #379384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.59
2025 Page 5 of 9
(B) independently investigate any allegation of misconduct by
members of the Police Department upon a two-thirds majority vote.
(2) An investigation or review shall be conducted by an independent
investigator hired by the Board of Police Commissioners and approved by the
City Attorney’s Office, and completed within a time established by ordinance.
(3) Upon the conclusion of such an investigation, the Board of Police
Commissioners may make a recommendation per subdivision (1)(A) of this
subsection. The Board of Police Commissioners shall not have the authority to
investigate or impose discipline upon the Chief of Police. Matters regarding
the alleged misconduct of the Chief of Police shall be addressed in conformity
with subsection 190(b) of this charter and other relevant Vermont statutes.
(f) Upon receiving a recommendation by the Board of Police
Commissioners in subsection (e) of this section, the Chief of Police may accept
the recommendation subject to the notice and hearing provisions in Article 62,
subsection 190(a) of this charter or reject the recommendation. In the event
the Chief of Police rejects the recommendation, the Chief of Police shall
immediately notify the Board of Police Commissioners. Upon receiving notice
of the rejection, the Board of Police Commissioners may, upon a two-thirds
majority vote, request that an independent panel decide the disposition of the
matter within a time established by ordinance, subject to the notice and hearing
provisions set forth in Article 62, subsection 190(a) of this charter. The
VT LEG #379384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.59
2025 Page 6 of 9
disposition of the independent panel shall be final, subject to any applicable
right of appeal or grievance process. This independent panel shall consist of
three to five persons appointed per ordinance.
§ 185. OFFICERS OF POLICE FORCE DEPARTMENT DESIGNATED
(a) The direction and control of the entire police force Police Department,
except as herein otherwise provided, shall be vested in a police officer who
shall be called the Chief of Police, and such other ranking police officers as the
City Council shall authorize, subject to the ordinances, resolutions, and orders
of the city council; and, provided that the Mayor shall retain the powers and
duties of chief executive officer pursuant to section 116 of this charter. The
order of rank and succession within the Police Department shall be as
designated by the City Council by regulation.
(b) Except as herein otherwise provided, such the officers shall have the
powers and duties granted to police officers by Vermont law and assigned to
them by regulations adopted under section 184 of this charter.
* * *
§ 190. CHIEF OF POLICE MAY REMOVE MEMBER FOR CAUSE;
HEARING
(a) Whenever it shall appear to the Chief of Police that any member of said
force the Department has become incompetent, inefficient, or incapable from
any cause, or is or has been negligent or derelict in his or her the Department
VT LEG #379384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.59
2025 Page 7 of 9
member’s official duty, or is guilty of any misconduct in his or her the
Department member’s private or official life, or whenever any well-grounded
complaints or charges to such effect are made in writing to the Chief of Police
by a responsible person against such member, the Chief of Police may
investigate and, after appropriate notice and hearing, dismiss such member
from the force Department, order a demotion in rank, or suspend the member
without pay for a specified time period in excess of 14 days. In connection
with any possible dismissal, demotion, or suspension for more than 14 days,
the Chief’s notice to the member shall be given at least 48 hours prior to any
hearing and shall include a description of the charges being considered. In
connection therewith, the Chief of Police shall have the power to subpoena
documents and witnesses and to administer the oath to such the witnesses.
Such a subpoena will be subject to enforcement or modification pursuant to the
procedures set forth in 3 V.S.A. §§ 809a and 809b. The Board of Police
Commissioners or, in the case it has already offered an opinion on discipline
pursuant to subsection 184(e) of this charter or in the case that the voting
number of commissioners falls below four due to declared actual or apparent
conflict of interest, an independent panel comprised as in subsection 184(f) of
this charter shall hear any appeal filed in a timely manner with respect to such
actions of the Police Chief. The time of filing an appeal and the nature of the
appellate process shall be as determined by such Board of Regulation.
VT LEG #379384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.59
2025 Page 8 of 9
Following its consideration of any such appeal, the Board may affirm, modify,
or vacate the decision made by the Chief of Police.
(b) Whenever it shall appear to the Mayor that the Chief of Police has
become incompetent, inefficient, or incapable from any cause, or has been
negligent or derelict in his or her the Chief’s official duty, or is guilty of any
misconduct in his or her the Chief’s private or official life, or whenever any
well-grounded complaints or charges to such effect are made in writing to the
Mayor by a responsible person, the Mayor may suspend the Chief of Police
from duty pending a hearing thereon on the matter by the City Council. The
City Council shall forthwith notify the Chief of Police of the charges preferred
by them, or of the complaints or charges presented by such the responsible
person in writing, and shall thereupon proceed to consider and investigate the
same. It shall appoint a time and place for the hearing of such the complaints
and charges so made, shall give the Chief of Police reasonable notice of the
same, not less than 48 hours, and the City Council shall have the power to
subpoena documents and witnesses and to administer the oath to such the
witnesses. Such a subpoena will be subject to enforcement or modification
pursuant to the procedures set forth in 3 V.S.A. §§ 809a and 809b.
(c) If, upon hearing, the City Council shall find such the complaints or
charges to be well founded, it may dismiss the Chief of Police from the force
Police Department, demote him or her the Chief in rank, or suspend him or her
VT LEG #379384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.59
2025 Page 9 of 9
the Chief without pay for a period not to exceed 60 days. The procedures
outlined in this section shall control in the event of any conflict with section
129 of this charter as pertains to the removal of the Chief of Police.
(d) The Chief of Police may, without notice or hearing for any infraction,
violation, or disobedience of any of the rules and regulations of the Police
Department that may seem to the Chief sufficient, suspend from duty without
pay any member of the police force Police Department for a period not to
exceed 14 days.
* * *
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379384 v.1